Utah statutes.
24-1-13.   Limitation on fees for holding seized property.
In any civil or criminal proceeding under this chapter in which a judgment is
entered in favor of an owner, or where a forfeiture proceeding against an
owner is voluntarily dismissed by the prosecuting attorney, the seizing agency
shall be prohibited from charging that owner any fee for holding seized
property.
